District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.44b

Legislative branch information technology acquisition.

(a)

A legislative branch agency may invest in, acquire, use, and manage, independent of the Executive branch, information technology and telecommunications systems and resources, including hardware, software, and contract services.

(b)

A legislative branch agency may, independent of the Executive branch, establish, acquire, maintain, and manage electronic mail messaging systems and services, internet access services, and information technology security systems and services.

History

July 24, 1982, D.C. Law 4-127, § 2b
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1101, 57 DCR 181
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 6, 59 DCR 6190

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-301.44a.

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 made a technical correction to D.C. Law 18-11 which did not affect this section as codified.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1101 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1101 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).